Washington statutes.
RCW 11.28.235

Limitation of action against sureties.

All actions against sureties shall be commenced within six years after the revocation or surrender of letters of administration or death of the principal.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.28.235. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 80; RCW 11.28.310; RRS s 1450; prior: 1891 p 385 s 21; Code 1881 s 1431; 1854 p 274 s 42.]